North Carolina statutes. Chapter 15. Criminal Procedure.
Article 15B. Pretrial Examination of Witnesses and Exhibits of the State. [Repealed]

§§ 15-155.4,
15-155.5.
[Repealed]

Repealed by Session Laws 1973, c. 1286, s. 26.

Cross References.

See Editor’s note following the analysis to this Chapter.

For present provisions as to discovery in criminal cases, see

G.S. 15A-901

et seq.